Hawaii statutes.
[§174C-11] Hearings officers. (a) The
chairperson may appoint hearings officers, not subject to chapter 76, to hear
and reach a preliminary decision on any matter concerning the implementation or
administration of the state water code which the commission may refer to the
hearings officers by rule or otherwise.

(b) In assigning matters to hearings officers,
the chairperson shall make the assignments in a manner which ensures that
hearings officers will develop familiarity and expertise with given geographic
areas.

(c) In conducting a hearing on any matter
referred by the commission, a hearings officer shall solicit and consider the
views of the appropriate county officials responsible for planning, economic
development, and resource management and such other county officials and others
as the commission shall direct. Any affected county agency shall be admitted
as a party upon request.

(d) Each hearings officer is deemed to be an
agent of the commission with all powers associated with such designation.

(e) In order to facilitate dispute resolution,
the commission may employ mediation methods where practicable including the use
of masters.

(f) The commission shall adjudicate disputes
where there is insufficient water to meet competing needs. [L 1987, c 45, pt of
§2; am L 2000, c 253, §150]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next